Washington statutes.
RCW 27.53.150

Proceeds from state's property—Deposit and use.

Any proceeds from the state's share of property under this chapter shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for deposit in the general fund to be used only for the purposes of historic preservation and underwater archaeology.

[ 1988 c 124 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—Application—1988 c 124: See notes following RCW 27.53.030.